Vermont, session 2025-2026, H123.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1201 is amended to read:
§ 1201. OPERATING VEHICLE UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF
ALCOHOL OR OTHER SUBSTANCE; CRIMINAL REFUSAL;
ENHANCED PENALTY FOR BAC OF 0.16 OR MORE
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 2 of 12
(a) Prohibition. A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in
actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway:
(1) when the person’s alcohol concentration is:
(A) 0.08 or more; or
(B) 0.02 or more if the person is operating a school bus as defined in
subdivision 4(34) of this title; or
(C) 0.04 or more if the person is operating a commercial vehicle as
defined in subdivision 4103(4) of this title; or
(2) when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or
(3) when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the
combined influence of alcohol and any other drug; or
(4) when the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle is impaired by
the consumption of alcohol.
(b) Previous conviction; criminal refusal. A person who has previously
been convicted of a violation of this section shall not operate, attempt to
operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway and refuse
a law enforcement officer’s reasonable request under the circumstances for an
evidentiary test where the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person
was in violation of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Serious bodily injury or death; criminal refusal. A person shall not
operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle on a
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 3 of 12
highway and be involved in a crash or collision resulting in serious bodily
injury or death to another and refuse a law enforcement officer’s reasonable
request under the circumstances for an evidentiary test where the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person has any amount of alcohol or drugs in
his or her the person’s system.
(d) Enhanced penalty for BAC of 0.16 or more.
(1) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of
subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section when the person’s alcohol
concentration is proven to be 0.16 or more shall not, for three years from the
date of the conviction for which the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.16 or
more, operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of any
vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.02 or more.
The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other
penalties imposed by law.
(2) A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual
physical control of any vehicle on a highway when the person’s alcohol
concentration is 0.02 or more if the person has previously been convicted of a
second or subsequent violation of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section
within the preceding three years and the person’s alcohol concentration for the
second or subsequent violation was proven to be 0.16 or greater. A violation
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 4 of 12
of this subsection shall be considered a third or subsequent violation of this
section and shall be subject to the penalties of subsection 1210(d) of this title.
(e) Limitation on defense. The fact that a person charged with a violation
of this section is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this State
shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
(f) Limitation on prosecution. A person may not be convicted of more than
one violation of subsection (a) of this section arising out of the same incident.
(g) Affirmative defense. For purposes of this section and section 1205 of
this title, the defendant may assert as an affirmative defense that the person
was not operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of the
vehicle because the person:
(1) had no intention of placing the vehicle in motion; and
(2) had not placed the vehicle in motion while under the influence or
while ability impaired.
(h) Definitions.
(1) As used in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, “under the influence of
a drug” means that a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle safely is
diminished or impaired in the slightest degree. This subsection shall not be
construed to affect the meaning of the term “under the influence of alcohol.”
(2) As used in subdivision (a)(4) of this section, “impaired by the
consumption of alcohol” means that a person’s blood alcohol concentration is
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 5 of 12
not less than 0.06 and not more than 0.079. This subsection shall not be
construed to affect the meaning of the term “under the influence of alcohol.”
(i) Evidence; presumptive admissibility. Evidence of the results of a
standardized field sobriety test conducted by a law enforcement officer trained
in Advanced Roadside Impaired Driving Enforcement or a certified Drug
Recognition Expert’s systematic evaluation of observable signs and symptoms
of a person charged with a violation of this section shall be presumptively
admissible at trial to demonstrate whether or not the person was operating
under the influence in violation of this section.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1210 is amended to read:
§ 1210. PENALTIES
(a) Screening. Before sentencing a defendant under this section, the court
may order that the defendant submit to an alcohol assessment screening. Such
a screening report may be considered at sentencing in the same manner as a
presentence report. At sentencing, the defendant may present relevant
evidence, including the results of any independent alcohol assessment that was
conducted at the person’s own expense. Evidence regarding any such
screening or an alcohol assessment performed at the expense of the defendant
shall not be admissible for any other purpose without the defendant’s consent.
(b) First offense.
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 6 of 12
(1) A person who violates section 1201 of this title may be fined not
more than $750.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, a person who
violates subdivision 1201(a)(4) of this title shall be subject to a civil violation
and fined not more than $500.00.
(c) Second offense. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this
title who has been convicted or adjudicated of another violation of that section
within the last 20 years shall be fined not more than $1,500.00 or imprisoned
not more than two years, or both. At least 200 hours of community service
shall be performed, or 60 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment
shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised
sentence, except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for
time served in a residential alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program
is successfully completed.
(d) Third offense. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title
who has previously been convicted or adjudicated two times of a violation of
that section, including at least one violation within the last 20 years, shall be
fined not more than $2,500.00 or imprisoned not more than five years, or both.
At least 96 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served
and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence,
except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 7 of 12
served in a residential alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program is
successfully completed. The court may impose a sentence that does not
include a term of imprisonment or that does not require that the 96 hours of
imprisonment be served consecutively only if the court makes written findings
on the record that such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and public
safety.
(e) Fourth or subsequent offense.
(1) A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title who has
previously been convicted or adjudicated three or more times of a violation of
that section, including at least one violation within the last 20 years, shall be
fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both.
At least 192 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served
and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence,
except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time
served in a residential alcohol treatment facility pursuant to sentence if the
program is successfully completed. The court shall not impose a sentence that
does not include a term of imprisonment unless the court makes written
findings on the record that there are compelling reasons why such a sentence
will serve the interests of justice and public safety.
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 8 of 12
(2) The Department of Corrections shall provide alcohol and substance
abuse treatment, when appropriate, to any person convicted of a violation of
this subsection.
(f) Death resulting.
(1) If the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of
this title, the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than
$10,000.00 or imprisoned not less than one year nor more than 15 years, or
both. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or restrict prosecutions for
manslaughter.
(2) If the death of more than one person results from a violation of
section 1201 of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation
of this subdivision for each decedent.
(3)(A) If the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201
of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been
convicted two or more times of a violation of that section, a sentence ordered
pursuant to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-
year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision (3)(A) shall
be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised
sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 9 of 12
any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of
imprisonment.
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), if the
death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the
person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more
times of a violation of that section, the court may impose a sentence that does
not include a term of imprisonment or that includes a term of imprisonment of
less than five years if the court makes written findings on the record that such a
sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.
(g) Injury resulting.
(1) If serious bodily injury, as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2), results to
any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title,
the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or
imprisoned not more than 15 years, or both.
(2) If serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to
more than one person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201
of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this
subdivision for each person injured.
(3)(A) If serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results
to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this
title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 10 of 12
two or more times of a violation of section 1201, a sentence ordered pursuant
to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-
year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision (3)(A) shall
be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised
sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough,
or any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of
imprisonment.
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), if
serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to any person
other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the
person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more
times of a violation of section 1201, the court may impose a sentence that does
not include a term of imprisonment or that includes a term of imprisonment of
less than five years if the court makes written findings on the record that such a
sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.
(h) Determination of fines. In determining appropriate fines under this
section, the court may take into account the total cost to a defendant of alcohol
screening, participation in the Alcohol and Driving Education Program and
therapy, and the income of the defendant.
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 11 of 12
(i) Surcharge; Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund. A person
convicted of violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of
$60.00, which shall be added to any fine imposed by the court. The court shall
collect and transfer such surcharge to the Department of Public Safety for
deposit in the Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund established by
section 1220b of this title.
(j) Surcharge; Public Defender Special Fund. A person convicted of
violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00,
which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court
shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to the
Office of Defender General for deposit in the Public Defender Special Fund,
specifying the source of the monies being deposited. The collection
procedures described in 13 V.S.A. § 5240 shall be utilized in the collection of
this surcharge.
(k) Surcharge; DUI Enforcement Special Fund. A person convicted of
violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00,
which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court
shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be
credited to the DUI Enforcement Special Fund. The collection procedures
described in 13 V.S.A. § 5240 shall be utilized in the collection of this
surcharge.
VT LEG #379986 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.123
2025 Page 12 of 12
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379986 v.2